hu: Megfelelő szórható anyag: Komposzt; Műtrágya; Fűmag; Gyomirtó granulátum; Rovarirtó granulátum; Mész; Növényvédőszer granulátum; Só/olvadt jég; Homok; Egyéb
sv: Lämpligt spridningsbart material: Kompost; Gödningsmedel; Gräsfrö; Herbicidgranulat; Insekticidgranulat; Lime; Bekämpningsmedelsgranulat; Salt/is smälter; Sand; Annat
pt-BR: Material adequado para espalhar: Adubo; Fertilizantes; Semente de grama; Grânulos de herbicida; Grânulos de inseticida; Lima; Grânulos de pesticida; Sal/derretimento do gelo; Areia; Outro
hr-HR: Prikladan materijal za posipanje: Kompost; Gnojivo; Sjeme trave; Granule herbicida; Granule insekticida; Limeta; Granule pesticida; Sol / sredstvo za otapanje leda; Pijesak; Ostalo
sl-SI: Primeren material za trosenje: Kompost; Gnojila; Seme trave; Herbicidne granule; Insekticidne granule; Limeta; Pesticidne granule; Taljenje soli/ledu; Pesek; Druga
zh-CN: 适合的涂抹材料: 堆肥; 肥料; 草籽; 除草剂颗粒; 杀虫剂颗粒; 石灰; 除草剂颗粒; 盐/融雪剂; 沙子; 其他
nb: Egnet spredemateriale: Kompost; Gjødsel; Gressfrø; Herbicidgranulat; Insektmiddelgranulat; Lime; Pesticidgranulat; Salt/is smelter; Sand; Annet
fi: Sopiva levitemateriaali: Kompostimulta; Lannoite; Ruohonsiemen; Rikkakasvien torjunta-ainerakeet; Hyönteismyrkkyrakeet; Kalkki; Torjunta-ainerakeet; Suola-/jääsulatus; Hiekka; Muu
zh-TW: 適用撒播材料: 堆肥; 肥料; 草籽; 除草劑顆粒; 殺蟲顆粒; 石灰; 殺害蟲顆粒; 鹽/融冰劑; 沙子; 其他
bg-BG: Подходящ материал за разпръскване: Компост; Тор; Тревни семена; Хербицидни гранули; Инсектицидни гранули; Лайм; Пестицидни гранули; Сол/за разтапяне на лед; Пясък; Друго
ja: 適切な散布素材: コンポスト; 肥料; 芝生の種; 顆粒除草剤; 顆粒殺虫剤; 石灰; 顆粒農薬; 解けた塩/氷; 砂; その他
el: Κατάλληλο υλικό διασποράς: Λίπασμα λιπασματοποίησης (κομπόστ); Λίπασμα; Σπόρος χόρτου; Κόκκοι ζιζανιοκτόνου; Κόκκοι εντομοκτόνου; Ασβέστης; Κόκκοι φυτοφαρμάκων; Λιώσιμο αλατιού/πάγου; Άμμος; Άλλο
th: วัสดุที่เหมาะสมสำหรับการโรย: ปุ๋ยหมัก; ปุ๋ย; เมล็ดหญ้า; เม็ดสารกำจัดวัชพืช; เม็ดสารฆ่าแมลง; มะนาว; เม็ดสารกำจัดศัตรูพืช; เกลือ/สารละลายน้ำแข็ง; ทราย; อื่นๆ
es: Material adecuado para esparcir: Abono; Fertilizante; Semilla de césped; Gránulos de herbicida; Gránulos de insecticida; Lima; Gránulos de pesticidas; Derretimiento de sal/hielo; Arena; Otros
cs: Vhodný materiál do rozmetadla: Kompost; Hnojivo; Travní semeno; Herbicidní granule; Granulovaný insekticid; Vápno; Granulovaný pesticid; Sůl / rozmrazovací prostředek; Písek; Jiné
fr: Matériaux d’épandage compatibles: Compost; Engrais; Semences de gazon; Granulés d’herbicide; Granulés d’insecticides; Citron vert; Granulés de pesticides; Sel/fondant à glace; Sable; Autre
ko: 적합한 살포 재료: 퇴비; 비료; 잔디 씨앗; 제초제 과립; 살충제 과립; 라임; 농약/살충제 과립; 소금/제설제; 모래; 기타
it: Materiale di diffusione adatto: Compost; Fertilizzanti; semi di erba; Granuli di erbicida; Granuli insetticidi; Lime; Granuli di pesticidi; Scioglimento del sale/ghiaccio; Sabbia; Altro
nl: Geschikt strooimateriaal: Compost; Kunstmest; Graszaad; Onkruidverdelger; Insecticidekorrels; Limoen; Pesticidenkorrels; Strooizout; Zand; Overig
pl: Odpowiedni materiał do rozsiewu: Kompost; Nawóz; Nasiona trawy; Granulat herbicydowy; Granulat insektycydowy; Wapno; Granulat pestycydowy; Sól / środek do topienia lodu; Piasek; Inne
vi: Vật liệu rải phù hợp: Phân hữu cơ; Phân bón; Hạt giống cỏ; Thuốc diệt cỏ dạng hạt; Thuốc diệt côn trùng dạng hạt; Chanh xanh; Thuốc trừ sâu dạng hạt; Muối/nước đá tan chảy; Cát; Khác
sk-SK: Vhodný posypový materiál: Kompost; Hnojivo; Semená trávy; Granulovaný herbicíd; Granulovaný insekticíd; Vápno; Granulovaný pesticíd; Soľ/rozmrazovací materiál; Piesok; Iné
tr: Uygun serpme malzemesi: Kompost; Gübre; Çim tohumu; Herbisit granülleri; İnsektisit granüller; Kireç; Pestisit granülleri; Tuz / buz çözücü; Kum; Diğer
de: Geeignetes Streumaterial: Kompost; Dünger; Grassamen; Herbizidgranulat; Insektizidgranulat; Limette; Pestizidgranulat; Salz-/Eisschmelze; Sand; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Material adequado para espalhar: Composto; Fertilizador; Semente de erva; Grânulos de herbicida; Grânulos de inseticida; Lima; Grânulos de pesticida; Sal/derretedor de gelo; Areia; Outro
ru: Материалы для разбрасывания: Компост; Удобрения; Семена травы; Гранулы гербицида; Гранулы инсектицида; Известь; Гранулы пестицида; Соль/антиобледенитель; Песок; Другое
lt-LT: Tinkama barstymo medžiaga: Kompostas; Trąšos; Žolės sėklos; Herbicidų granulės; Insekticidų granulės; Žalioji citrina; Pesticidų granulės; Druskos / ledo tirpiklis; Smėlis; Kita
en: Suitable spread material: Compost; Fertilizer; Grass seed; Herbicide granules; Insecticide granules; Lime; Pesticide granules; Salt/ice melt; Sand; Other
da: Egnet spredemateriale: Kompost; Gødning; Græsfrø; Sprøjtemiddelsgranulater; Insektsmiddelsgranulater; Lime; Pesticidsgranulater; Salt/is-masse; Sand; Andet
ro-RO: Material de împrăștiere adecvat: Compost; Îngrășământ; Semințe de iarbă; Granule de erbicid; Granule de insecticid; Var; Granule de pesticid; Topirea sării/gheții; Nisip; Altele